Nevada, session 83, SB211.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 288.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.500 1. For the purposes of collective bargaining,
supplemental bargaining and other mutual aid or protection,
employees have the right to:
(a) Organize, form, join and assist labor organizations, engage in
collective bargaining and supplemental bargaining through
exclusive representatives and engage in other concerted activities;
and
(b) Refrain from engaging in such activity.
2. Collective bargaining and supplemental bargaining entail a
mutual obligation of the Executive Department and an exclusive
representative to meet at reasonable times and to bargain in good
faith with respect to:
(a) The subjects of mandatory bargaining set forth in subsection
2 of NRS 288.150, except paragraph (f) of that subsection;
(b) The negotiation of an agreement;
(c) The resolution of any question arising under an agreement;
and
(d) The execution of a written contract incorporating the
provisions of an agreement, if requested by either party.
3. Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of
subsection 2, the Executive Department and the exclusive
representative of each bargaining unit established pursuant to
paragraphs (g), (h), (i) and (k) to (o), inclusive, of subsection 1 of
NRS 288.515 may negotiate for such employees to leave the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program and obtain other life, accident or
health insurance, or any combination thereof. The provisions of
NRS 287.0479 do not apply to a group of employees who negotiate
to leave the Public Employees’ Benefits Program pursuant to this
paragraph.
4. The subject matters set forth in subsection 3 of NRS 288.150
are not within the scope of mandatory bargaining and are reserved to
the Executive Department without negotiation.
[4.] 5. Notwithstanding the provisions of any collective
bargaining agreement negotiated pursuant to the provisions of NRS
288.400 to 288.630, inclusive, the Executive Department is entitled
to take the actions set forth in paragraph (b) of subsection 6 of NRS
288.150. Any action taken under the provisions of this subsection
must not be construed as a failure to negotiate in good faith.
[5.] 6. This section does not preclude, but the provisions of
NRS 288.400 to 288.630, inclusive, do not require, the Executive
Department to negotiate subject matters set forth in subsection [3] 4
-
*SB211*

– 3 –
which are outside the scope of mandatory bargaining. The Executive
Department shall discuss subject matters outside the scope of
mandatory bargaining but it is not required to negotiate those
matters.
[6.] 7. The Executive Department shall furnish to an exclusive
representative data that is maintained in the ordinary course of
business and which is relevant and necessary to the discussion of the
subjects of mandatory bargaining described in subsection 2. This
subsection shall not be construed to require the Executive
Department to furnish to the exclusive representative any advice or
training received by representatives of the Executive Department
concerning collective bargaining.
[7.] 8. To the greatest extent practicable, any decision issued
by the Board before October 1, 2019, relating to the interpretation
of, or the performance under, the provisions of NRS 288.150 shall
be deemed to apply to any complaint arising out of the interpretation
of, or performance under, the provisions of this section.
H
-
*SB211*